Maryland, session 2026, HB0255.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–435.
(a) There is a Pamela J. Kelly Tree–Mendous Maryland Program in the
Department.
(b) The Program is established for the purpose of ADVANCING FOREST HEALTH
AND RESILIENCE BY PROMOTING, planting, PROMOTING COMMUNITY
PARTICIPATION IN TREE PLANTING AND STEWARDSHIP AND THE PLANTING AND
MAINTAINING OF native trees and shrubs THROUGH COMMUNITY FORESTRY
ACTIVITIES on public lands, community open spaces, school grounds, and rights–of–way.
(c) The Department shall administer the Program.
(d) The Department may adopt regulations to carry out this part.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 1 –